Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1006.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23-3 of the General Laws entitled "Vital Records" is hereby amended
by adding thereto the following section:
23-3-10.3. Certificate of birth -- Modification.
A person eighteen (18) years of age or older may request that the description of the person's
race be modified or amended on their birth certificate in a manner that utilizes culturally sensitive
language and terminology. Such a request shall be made through the state office of vital records.
The department of health may promulgate rules and regulations and/or develop a process to
accommodate all reasonable requests in a manner which uses culturally sensitive language and
terminology to identify, modify and/or amend descriptions of race.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002557/SUB A
========